Washington statutes.
RCW 38.16.030

Inactive national guard.

The inactive national guard of this state shall respectively be organized by the governor in regulations in conformance with the laws, rules and regulations of the United States. It shall consist of such organizations, officers and enlisted persons as the governor shall prescribe. No commissioned officer shall be transferred or furloughed to the inactive national guard without the officer's written consent, except as otherwise expressly provided by law. Any officer of the inactive national guard may be restored to the active list by order of the governor, subject to the same examination as in the case of an original appointment to his or her rank, and in such event his or her service in the inactive national guard shall not be counted in computing total length of service for relative seniority.

[ 2009 c 549 s 1012; 1991 c 43 s 3; 1989 c 19 s 32; 1943 c 130 s 34; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-34. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 29.]